ThuNoun.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
ThuStem;

LEXICON ThuStem

හතු ThuNoun;
මුතු ThuNoun;

LEXICON ThuNoun
+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ව #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වට #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:වක #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:වකට #;
+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:්ත #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:්තට #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:්තක #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:්තකට #;
+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:වේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:වේත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:වෙන් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:්තෙන් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වක් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වම #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වවත් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වල #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim: #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වලට #
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වලින් #
